Utah statutes.
59-2-803.   Statement transmitted by county auditors to governing bodies -- Contents of statement.

(1)  The county auditor shall transmit to the governing bodies of taxing entities in which the property is located, or to which any of the value is apportioned, a statement of the valuation of all property as fixed and apportioned by the commission and reported under Section 59-2-802.

(2)  The statement under Subsection (1) shall contain the aggregate amount of taxable value placed in dispute by property owners within the county pursuant to Section 59-2-1007.

(3)  The statement shall be transmitted at the same time and in the same manner as the statement is transmitted under Section 59-2-924.

